Hawaii statutes.
[§508C-3] Nature of rights; subordination
of interests. (a) Any person, the agency, or a county may be a holder.
An environmental covenant may identify more than one holder. The interest of a
holder shall be an interest in real property.

(b) A right of an agency under this chapter or
under an environmental covenant, other than a right as a holder, shall not be
an interest in real property.

(c) An agency shall be bound by any obligation
the agency assumes in an environmental covenant; provided that an agency shall
not assume obligations merely by signing an environmental covenant. Any other
person that signs an environmental covenant shall be bound by the obligations
the person assumes in the covenant; provided that signing the covenant shall
not change obligations, rights, or protections granted or imposed under law
other than this chapter except as provided in the covenant.

(d) The following rules apply to interests in
real property in existence at the time an environmental covenant covering that
real property is created or amended:

(1) An interest that has priority under other law
shall not be affected by an environmental covenant, unless the person that owns
the interest subordinates that interest to the covenant;

(2) A person that owns a prior interest shall not be
required to subordinate that interest to an environmental covenant or to agree
to be bound by the covenant;

(3) A subordination agreement may be contained in an
environmental covenant covering real property or in a separate record. If the
environmental covenant covers commonly-owned property in a common interest
community, the record may be signed by any person authorized by the governing
board of the common interest community; and

(4) An agreement by a person to subordinate a prior
interest to an environmental covenant shall affect the priority of that
person's interest; provided that it shall not by itself impose any affirmative
obligation on the person with respect to the environmental covenant. [L 2006, c
279, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next